Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2750.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 41, chapter 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 6, to read: ARTICLE 6. TRADE COMMISSIONS START_STATUTE41-1391. Arizona-Sonora trade commission; membership; duties; annual report A. The Arizona-Sonora trade commission is established. The commission membership consists of: 1. FIVE members who have knowledge of or any involvement in an organization that promotes Sonoran affairs or who have interest in the well-being of trade relations between this state and Sonora, Mexico. The president of the senate shall appoint THREE OF these members.  tHE LEADER OF THE SENATE MINORITY PARTY SHALL APPOINT TWO OF THESE MEMBERS. 2. FIVE members who have knowledge of or any involvement in an organization that promotes Sonoran affairs or who have interest in the well-being of trade relations between this state and Sonora, Mexico. The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint THREE OF these members.  THE LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES MINORITY PARTY SHALL APPOINT TWO OF THESE MEMBERS. B. All appointments shall be made not later than December 31, 2026 and shall be for a term of four years. All vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the initial appointment. Appointed members of the commission shall receive compensation as determined pursuant to section 38-611 for each day actually spent in the performance of official duties and are eligible for reimbursement of expenses pursuant to title 38, chapter 4, article 2. C. The commission shall: 1. Annually elect a chairperson and vice chairperson from among its members. 2. Meet at least annually and at the call of the chairperson. 3. Advance bilateral trade and investment between this state and Sonora, Mexico. 4. Initiate joint action on policy issues of mutual interest between this state and Sonora, Mexico. 5. Promote business and academic exchanges between this state and Sonora, Mexico. 6. Encourage mutual economic support between this state and Sonora, Mexico. 7. Encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure of this state and Sonora, Mexico. 8. On or before December 31, 2027 and each year thereafter, submit a report containing the commission's findings, results and recommendations to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of the report to the secretary of state. END_STATUTE Sec. 2.2. Title 41, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3031.08, to read: START_STATUTE41-3031.08. Arizona-Sonora trade commission; termination July 1, 2031 A. The Arizona-Sonora trade commission terminates on July 1, 2031. B. Title 41, chapter 8, article 6 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2032. END_STATUTE Sec. 3.3. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the Arizona-Sonora trade commission is established to encourage economic support and investment between this state and Sonora, Mexico.